Washington statutes.
RCW 2.10.180

Benefits exempt from taxation and judicial process—Exceptions—Deductions for group insurance premiums.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section, the right of a person to a retirement allowance, disability allowance, or death benefit, the retirement, disability or death allowance itself, any optional benefit, any other right accrued or accruing to any person under the provisions of this chapter, and the moneys in the fund created under this chapter, are hereby exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, or any other process of law whatsoever whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of public employees of the state of Washington.

(3) Deductions made in the past from retirement benefits are hereby expressly recognized, ratified, and affirmed. Future deductions may only be made in accordance with this section.

(4) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) a notice of payroll deduction issued under chapter 26.23 RCW, (c) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

[ 2012 c 159 s 17; 1991 c 365 s 18; 1989 c 360 s 22; 1987 c 326 s 17; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 1; 1979 ex.s. c 205 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 267 s 18.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.

Effective date—1987 c 326: See RCW 41.50.901.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: "(1) Sections 9 and 34 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately.

(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect July 1, 1982." [ 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 37.]